New York, session 2025-2026, S2382.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 215-d to 2 read as follows: 3 § 215-d. Employee confrontation of theft; prohibited retaliation. 1. 4 No employer or their agent, or the officer or agent of any corporation, 5 partnership, or limited liability company, or any other person shall 6 discharge, threaten, penalize, or in any other manner discriminate or 7 retaliate against any employee because such employee confronts or 8 attempts to confront an individual to prevent a theft or the unlawful 9 taking of goods, wares, or merchandise. 10 2. As used in this section, to threaten, penalize, or in any other 11 manner discriminate or retaliate against any employee shall include 12 reducing work hours, denying a promotion, and/or decreasing pay, but 13 shall not include training or re-training on applicable employer poli- 14 cies. 15 3. Nothing in this section shall require an employee to confront, 16 prevent, or attempt to prevent a theft or the unlawful taking of goods, 17 wares, or merchandise of an employer, nor shall this section prevent an 18 employer from instituting a policy advising employees against confront- 19 ing, preventing, or attempting to prevent a theft or the unlawful taking 20 of goods, wares, or merchandise of an employer. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06436-01-5